Hawaii statutes.
[§327-13] Delivery of document of gift not
required; right to examine. (a) A document of gift need not be delivered
during the donor's lifetime to be effective.

(b) Upon or after an individual's death, a
person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical
gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the
document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the
making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to
which the gift could pass under section 327-11. [L 2008, c 122, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next